Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB375.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.805, No.247), known as the Pennsylvania Municipalities Planning Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 508.2. Signage on Subdivision or Land Development.--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627 ( a) No later than seven days after the first official submission of a subdivision or land development application, and as a criterion of approval, the subdivider or developer shall post signage of a minimum of nine square feet in surface area.(b) The developer shall ensure that:(1) The signage is conspicuously posted visibly along the external road frontage on each subdivision or land development.(2) The signage includes a description of the posted project and the entity where the subdivision or land development application was filed.(3) The signage type is of a sufficient size and font to read from a minimum viewing distance of 50 feet. A summary title of the proposed development must have a minimum of four-inch lettering.(4) The signage is installed outside of the limits of public right-of-way and in accordance with all applicable Federal and State requirements.(5) The signage remains posted until after approval, disapproval or withdrawal of the subdivision or land development application.(c) This section shall not apply to the following:(1) The improvement of one lot or two contiguous lots for a purpose involving no more than two single-family detached dwellings.(2) The subdivision of a single residential lot into no more than two resulting lots for the purpose of no more than two single-family detached dwellings.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0375PN0331 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829